Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-906
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner shall prescribe such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 76-901 to 76-907.

Laws 1965, c. 463, § 6, p. 1474.